Illinois, session 104th, SB604.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Community Expanded Mental Health Services 5Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (405 ILCS 22/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Community Expanded Mental Health Services Act.9(Source: P.A. 96-1548, eff. 1-1-12.)